Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.190

Preplacement report—Requirements—Fees.

(1) Any person may at any time request an agency, the department, an individual approved by the court, or a qualified salaried court employee to prepare a preplacement report. A certificate signed under penalty of perjury by the person preparing the report specifying his or her qualifications as required in this chapter shall be attached to or filed with each preplacement report and shall include a statement of training or experience that qualifies the person preparing the report to discuss relevant adoption issues. A person may have more than one preplacement report prepared. All preplacement reports shall be filed with the court in which the petition for adoption is filed.

(2) The preplacement report shall be a written document setting forth all relevant information relating to the fitness of the person requesting the report as an adoptive parent. The report shall be based on a study which shall include an investigation of the home environment, family life, health, facilities, and resources of the person requesting the report. The report shall include a list of the sources of information on which the report is based. The report shall include a recommendation as to the fitness of the person requesting the report to be an adoptive parent. The report shall also verify that the following issues were discussed with the prospective adoptive parents:

(a) The concept of adoption as a lifelong developmental process and commitment;

(b) The potential for the child to have feelings of identity confusion and loss regarding separation from the birth parents;

(c) If applicable, the relevance of the child's relationship with siblings and the potential benefit to the child of providing for a continuing relationship and contact between the child and known siblings;

(d) Disclosure of the fact of adoption to the child;

(e) The child's possible questions about birth parents and relatives; and

(f) The relevance of the child's racial, ethnic, and cultural heritage.

(3) All preplacement reports shall include a background check of any conviction records, pending charges, or disciplinary board final decisions of prospective adoptive parents. The background check shall include an examination of state and national criminal identification data provided by the Washington state patrol criminal identification system including, but not limited to, a fingerprint-based background check of national crime information databases for any person being investigated. It shall also include a review of any child abuse and neglect history of any adult living in the prospective adoptive parents' home. The background check of the child abuse and neglect history shall include a review of the child abuse and neglect registries of all states in which the prospective adoptive parents or any other adult living in the home have lived during the five years preceding the date of the preplacement report.

(4) An agency, the department, or a court approved individual may charge a reasonable fee based on the time spent in conducting the study and preparing the preplacement report. The court may set a reasonable fee for conducting the study and preparing the report when a court employee has prepared the report. An agency, the department, a court approved individual, or the court may reduce or waive the fee if the financial condition of the person requesting the report so warrants. An agency's, the department's, or court approved individual's, fee is subject to review by the court upon request of the person requesting the report.

(5) The person requesting the report shall designate to the agency, the department, the court approved individual, or the court in writing the county in which the preplacement report is to be filed. If the person requesting the report has not filed a petition for adoption, the report shall be indexed in the name of the person requesting the report and a cause number shall be assigned. A fee shall not be charged for filing the report. The applicable filing fee may be charged at the time a petition governed by this chapter is filed. Any subsequent preplacement reports shall be filed together with the original report.

(6) A copy of the completed preplacement report shall be delivered to the person requesting the report.

(7) A person may request that a report not be completed. A reasonable fee may be charged for the value of work done.

[ 2009 c 234 s 4; 2007 c 387 s 2; 1991 c 136 s 3; 1990 c 146 s 3; 1984 c 155 s 19.]